Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1244
State Treasurer; boards, commissions, departments, and agencies; money to invest; notify state investment officer; conditions.

The State Treasurer shall notify the state investment officer as to the amount of money in the General Fund and the funds of any board, commission, department, agency, or official charged with the control of any other state fund not currently needed and available for investment. When it shall appear to the State Treasurer that any such invested money is needed, he or she shall notify the state investment officer who shall make available from the pooled investments the amount required.

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 8, p. 2351;

Laws 1985, LB 335, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 149, § 1.